Hawaii statutes.
§835-1 Material witness order; defined.
A material witness order is a court order (1) adjudging a person a material
witness in a pending criminal action and (2) fixing bail to secure the person's
future attendance thereat. [L 1971, c 214, pt of §1; HRS §718-1; ren L 1972, c
9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next